Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 5 of this  2026 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 339.040
to 339.125.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 2 to 5 of this 2026 Act:
(1) “Enrollment” means attending classes and participating in extracurricular activities.
(2) “Fixed, regular and adequate nighttime residence” does not include:
(a) Sharing the housing of other persons due  to loss of housing, economic hardship or a
similar reason;
(b) Living in motels, hotels, trailer parks or camping grounds due to  the lack of alter-
native adequate accommodations;
(c) Living in emergency or transitional shelters;
(d) Living in a public or private place not designated for or ordinarily used as a  regular
sleeping accommodation for human beings; or
(e) Living in cars, parks, public spaces, abandoned buildings, substandard housing,  bus
or train stations or similar settings.
(3) “Homeless student” means a student who:
(a) Lacks a fixed, regular and adequate nighttime residence;
(b) Has been abandoned in a hospital; or
(c) Is living in any other circumstance under which  the student qualifies for support
under the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. 11431 et seq.
(4) “Local liaison” means a person designated by  a school district for the purposes de-
scribed in section 3 (2) of this 2026 Act.
(5) “Preschool” means an early childhood program:
(a) That serves children from birth through five years of age;
(b) That receives public funding; and
(c) For which a school district is accountable for providing  early childhood education
services or for which a school district is a financial or administrative agent.
(6) “School district” includes an education service district.
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-A) Page 1
(7) “School of origin” means the preschool or public school:
(a) That a student attended before the student became a homeless student,  including a
school attended as provided by ORS 339.133  (5) or a public school attended voluntarily and
for which there is no attendance boundary;
(b) In which the homeless student was last enrolled,  including a school attended as pro-
vided by ORS 339.133  (5) or a public school attended voluntarily and for which there is no
attendance boundary; or
(c) That, for a student who completes the final grade level served by a school  described
in paragraph (a) or  (b) of this subsection, is the next public school in grade-level progression
following the school described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(8) “School of residence” means any public  school for which students who live within the
attendance boundary where the homeless student lives are eligible to attend, including a
public school attended voluntarily and for which there is no attendance boundary.
(9) “State coordinator” means a person designated by the Department of  Education for
the purposes described in section 5 of this 2026 Act.
(10) “Student” means:
(a) Any child who is eligible for preschool; or
(b) Any person that a district school board must admit as provided by ORS 339.115.
(11) “Unaccompanied youth” means a homeless student who is not in the  physical cus-
tody of a parent or guardian.
SECTION 3.
(1) Each district school board shall adopt a policy  that provides for the im-
mediate enrollment, school placement and provision of services to homeless students.  A
policy must provide for:
(a) The immediate enrollment, school placement and provision of services regardless of:
(A) Lack of records normally required for enrollment, including student education  re-
cords, immunization  or other health records, proof of residency, guardianship records or
evaluations for special services or programs;
(B) Any missed deadlines related to enrollment, school placement or the  provision of
services; or
(C) Any disputes related to the enrollment, school placement or provision of services.
(b) An obligation by the school  district to assist with the transfer of any required records
of a homeless student, including:
(A) Immediately requesting the records from the school last attended by the student;
(B) Ensuring the transfer of records in a timely manner to any subsequent school at-
tended by the student; and
(C) Directing the local liaison to assist with  any immunization or health record require-
ments.
(c) The identification and removal of barriers to accessing  academic and extracurricular
activities by homeless students.
(d) The placement of homeless students in schools in a manner that is consistent with:
(A) The provisions of this section; and
(B) For public schools attended voluntarily and for which there  is no attendance bound-
ary, the requirements for placing similarly situated students who are  not homeless students
in those schools.
(e) A  dispute resolution process consistent with the provisions of section 4 of this 2026
Act.
(f) The coordination with local social services  agencies and other agencies or entities
providing services to homeless students and their families,  including coordination with the
Department of Human Services for runaway and homeless youth under ORS 417.799.
(g) The  collaboration with other school districts to coordinate transportation, the trans-
fer of education records and the provision of access to extracurricular activities for homeless
students.
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-A) Page 2
(h) The collaboration with any public charter schools sponsored by the school district  or
located within the school district to:
(A) Enroll or  place homeless students in the public charter school in a manner that is
consistent with the enrollment or placement of  similarly situated students who are not
homeless students;
(B) Provide services  available through the school district to homeless students placed in
a public charter school, including access to a local liaison and use of the dispute resolution
process described in section 4 of this 2026 Act; and
(C) Transfer any required records of a homeless student in a manner that is consistent
with subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(2)(a) Each school district shall designate at least one person to serve as a  local liaison
for the purposes of:
(A) Ensuring the effective delivery  of services for homeless students in the school dis-
trict, including:
(i) Identifying homeless students;
(ii) Assisting homeless students with enrollment and school placement; and
(iii) Assisting homeless students with accessing services  available for homeless students
under state and federal law;
(B) Aligning efforts to stabilize  and support homeless students and families in the school
district;
(C) Assisting unaccompanied youth with enrollment,  school placement, services for
homeless students and  the removal of other barriers to education and participation in ex-
tracurricular activities;
(D) Coordinating with administrators of  other programs serving homeless students in the
school district;
(E) Coordinating with any public  charter schools sponsored by the school district or lo-
cated within the school district; and
(F) Coordinating with the state coordinator as provided by section 5 of this 2026 Act.
(b) Nothing in this subsection prohibits a public  charter school from designating a person
to serve as a local liaison for  homeless students placed in the public charter school. A person
designated as a  local liaison by a public charter school shall coordinate with any persons
designated as a local liaison by the school district.
(3) Except as provided by subsection (4)  of this section, a school district shall place a
homeless student as follows:
(a) If the student had a school of origin, allow the  student to continue the student’s ed-
ucation in the school of origin for the duration of the time that the student is  a homeless
student, including continuing in the school of origin:
(A) For  the remainder of the school year during which the student became a homeless
student; or
(B) For the school  year following the summer during which the student became a
homeless student.
(b) If the student no longer is a homeless student during a school  year, allow the student
to continue the student’s education in the school that the student attended while a  homeless
student for the remainder of the school year.
(4)(a) A  school district may place a student in a different school than the school identi-
fied in subsection (3) of this section if the  school district determines that the placement is
in the student’s best interest.
(b) When determining a student’s best interest, the school district shall:
(A) Presume that keeping the student in the school of  origin is in the student’s best in-
terest, except when a parent, a guardian or an  unaccompanied youth requests placement in
a different school.
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-A) Page 3
(B) Consider factors related to the impact  of mobility on the student’s achievement, ed-
ucation, health and safety while giving priority to  a request made by a parent, a guardian
or an unaccompanied youth.
(5) When a school district places  a student in a school that is not the school of origin
or that is not the  school requested by the parent, guardian or unaccompanied youth, the
school district must:
(a) Provide to the parent, guardian  or unaccompanied youth a written notice of the de-
termination that includes:
(A) An explanation of the determination, including specific reasons for the decision;
(B) The findings and  evidence relied upon for the determination and the sources of the
findings and evidence;
(C) Notice of the right to appeal the determination;
(D) A clear description of the  appeals process, including the dispute resolution process
described in section 4 of this 2026 Act, and the relevant timelines; and
(E) For an unaccompanied youth, contact information for the  local liaison with a brief
description of the liaison’s role.
(b) Direct the  local liaison to ensure that an unaccompanied youth receives the written
notice described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(6)(a) A homeless student enrolled in a  school of origin must be provided transportation
to and from:
(A) The school of origin, if requested by the student’s parent  or guardian or, for an un-
accompanied youth, the request of the local liaison; and
(B) Extracurricular activities to  the extent the transportation removes the barrier to full
participation in the activities.
(b) Transportation described in paragraph (a) of this subsection must be provided as  fol-
lows:
(A) If the student continues to live within the school  district where the school of origin
is located, the school district where the school of origin is  located must provide transporta-
tion.
(B) If the student moves to a different school district than the school district  where the
school of origin is located but remains enrolled in the school of origin, the two school dis-
tricts shall:
(i) Share the costs  and responsibility of transportation based on an agreement between
the school districts; or
(ii) Equally share the costs  and responsibility of transportation if the school districts
cannot agree on how to share the costs and responsibility of transportation.
(c) A homeless student enrolled in a school of  residence or in a public charter school
must be provided transportation to and from:
(A) The school of residence or the public charter school if:
(i) The transportation would be provided to  a similarly situated student who is not a
homeless student; or
(ii) The transportation removes the barrier to the enrollment, attendance  or success in
school of the homeless student; and
(B) Extracurricular activities to  the extent the transportation removes the barrier to full
participation in the activities.
SECTION 4.
(1) Each district school board shall adopt a dispute resolution  process for
when a dispute arises  over the enrollment, school placement or provision of services to
homeless students.
(2)(a) If a dispute arises  over a student’s eligibility as a homeless student or over a
homeless student’s school placement, the student shall be:
(A) Immediately enrolled in the school  in which enrollment is sought by the parent,
guardian or unaccompanied youth; and
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-A) Page 4
(B) Provided transportation to and from the school and  extracurricular activities to the
extent the transportation removes the barrier to full participation in the activities.
(b) The  enrollment and provision of transportation described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall continue until final resolution of the dispute, including  all available appeals.
(3)(a) The school district shall establish a dispute resolution process and prescribe
timelines for the process to facilitate the expeditious resolution of  disputes. Any disputes
about school placement shall  include determinations of the student’s best interest, as de-
scribed in section 3 (4) of this 2026 Act.
(b) The dispute  resolution process shall include an optional informal resolution process
that may be used as  an alternative to a formal appeals process. The informal resolution
process must not waive the parent’s, guardian’s or unaccompanied  youth’s access to the
formal appeals process if the informal resolution process is not successful.
(c) Parents, guardians and unaccompanied youth shall have the right to bring a lawyer,
a nonlawyer advocate or any other person to provide assistance in the  dispute resolution
process.
(d) The school district shall provide translation, interpretation or other support services,
without charge, to  parents, guardians or unaccompanied youth who are involved in a dispute
resolution process and:
(A) Who are English language learners;
(B) Whose primary language is a language other than English; or
(C) Who need additional supports because of a disability.
(e) The  local liaison shall carry out the dispute resolution process as expeditiously as
possible after  receiving notice of the dispute. The local liaison shall assist the parent,
guardian or unaccompanied youth in preparing any appeals  and shall make the resources of
the school available to the parent, guardian or unaccompanied youth.
(4) The school district shall provide a written notice  of the determination of the dispute
resolution process to the parent,  guardian or unaccompanied youth. The notice must include:
(a) An explanation of the determination, including the specific reasons for the decision;
(b) The findings and evidence relied upon for the determination and the  sources of the
findings and evidence;
(c) Notice of the right to appeal the determination;
(d) A clear description of the appeals process, including relevant timelines;
(e) Contact information  for the local liaison and state coordinator, with a brief de-
scription of their roles; and
(f) A list of legal and advocacy providers  in the area that can provide additional assist-
ance.
SECTION 5.
The Department of Education shall designate a  state coordinator to be re-
sponsible for overseeing the implementation of sections 2 to 5  of this 2026 Act. The state
coordinator shall:
(1) Collaborate with educators, social  service providers and advocates for homeless stu-
dents and families in statewide programs and initiatives to address the needs of  homeless
students.
(2) Facilitate coordination between the department and  health care, social service and
other relevant service providers to ensure comprehensive support for homeless students and
their families, including developing an expedited referral system and interagency agreements
for sharing relevant data that is consistent with relevant privacy laws.
(3) Provide technical  assistance to, and conduct monitoring of, school districts in coor-
dination with local liaisons to:
(a) Coordinate with administrators of other programs serving homeless students  to en-
sure effective service delivery and to align efforts to stabilize and support homeless students
and families;
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-A) Page 5
(b) Coordinate with early childhood education programs to ensure access to  appropriate
services for homeless children who are eligible for preschool; and
(c) Ensure that school districts comply with state and federal  laws related to homeless
students.
(4) Respond to inquiries  from parents, guardians and unaccompanied youth to ensure
that homeless students receive the full protections of state  and federal law and relevant
services related to homeless students.
(5) Coordinate with state and local housing agencies responsible for  developing a com-
prehensive housing affordability strategy for the  purpose of minimizing educational dis-
ruption for homeless students.
(6) Help ensure that the department and school districts  adopt policies and practices that
do not cause stigmatization or segregation of homeless students on the basis of  their status
as homeless.
SECTION 6.  ORS 339.133 is amended to read:
339.133. (1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Foster  care” means substitute care for children placed by the Department of Human
Services or a tribal child welfare agency  away from their parents and for whom the department or
agency has placement and care responsibility,  including placements in foster family homes, foster
homes of relatives, group homes, emergency shelters, residential facilities, child care institutions and
preadoptive homes.
(B) “Foster care”  does not mean care for children whose parent or guardian voluntarily placed
the child outside the child’s home with a public or  private agency and for whom the child’s parent
or guardian retains legal guardianship.
(b)(A) “Person in parental relationship” means an adult who has physical custody of an  indi-
vidual or resides in the same  household as the individual, interacts with the individual daily, pro-
vides the individual with food, clothing, shelter and incidental necessaries and provides  the
individual with necessary care, education and discipline.
(B) “Person in parental relationship” does  not mean a person with a power of attorney or other
written delegation of parental responsibilities if the person does not have other evidence of  a par-
ental relationship.
(c) “School district of origin” means the  school district where an individual placed in foster
care was a resident before:
(A) The individual was placed into foster care; or
(B) The foster care placement of the individual changed.
[(d) “School of origin” means the school that an individual attended before: ]
[(A) The individual was placed into foster care; or ]
[(B) The foster care placement of the individual changed. ]
(2)(a) Except as provided in subsections  (3) to [ (5)] (6) of this section, individuals between the
ages of  4 and 18 shall be considered resident for school purposes in the school district in which their
parents, their guardians or persons in parental relationship to them reside.
(b) Nonemancipated individuals between the  ages of 4 and 18 living outside the geographic area
of the school  district for such reasons as attending college, military service, hospital confinement
or employment away from home shall  be considered resident in the district in which their parents,
their guardians or persons in parental relationship to them reside.
(c) Individuals living temporarily in a school district for the primary purpose  of attending a
district  school  may not be considered resident in the district in which they are living temporarily,
but shall be  considered resident in the district in which they, their parents, their guardians or per-
sons in parental relationship to them reside.
(3) Individuals considered legally emancipated  from their parents shall be considered resident
in the district in which they actually  reside, irrespective of the residence of their parents, their
guardians or persons in parental relationship.
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-A) Page 6
(4)(a) An individual who is between the ages of 4 and 21 and who is placed in  foster care shall
be considered a resident of:
(A) The school district of origin; or
(B) The school district  where the individual resides due to placement by the Department of
Human Services or a tribal child welfare agency if a juvenile court determines it is not in the  best
interest of the individual  to continue attending the school of origin or any other school in the school
district of origin, based on consideration of all factors relating to the individual’s best interests.
(b) If a juvenile court makes a determination that it is not in  the best interest of the individual
to continue  attending the school of origin, the individual shall be immediately enrolled in a new
school, even if the individual is unable to produce records normally required for enrollment.
(c) Individuals who are  residents of their school district of origin pursuant to paragraph (a)(A)
of this subsection shall:
(A) Remain in the individual’s school district of origin and, if  applicable, the individual’s school
of origin for the duration of the individual’s time in foster care; and
(B) Be provided, free  of charge, transportation between the individual’s home and the
individual’s school district of origin or, if applicable, the individual’s school of origin.
(d) The Department of Education, the Department of Human Services, tribal child welfare
agencies and school districts shall collaborate to  ensure that the provisions of this subsection are
implemented.
(e) As used in this subsection, “school of origin” means the school that an individual
placed in foster care attended before:
(A) The individual was placed into foster care; or
(B) The foster care placement of the individual changed.
(5)(a) Except as provided in ORS 327.006 (6) and 335.090, an individual whose legal residence is
not within the district but who attends school in the district  is considered a resident in the district
in which the individual  attends school if the individual receives written consent from both of the
affected district school boards as provided by policies adopted by the boards.
(b) An individual whose legal residence is not within the district but who attends school in the
district is considered a resident in the district in which the individual attends school if:
(A) The legal residence of the individual had been in the district in  which the individual attends
school before a boundary change was made to the district;
(B) The legal residence of the individual is no longer in the  district in which the individual at-
tends school because of the boundary change; and
(C) The individual has had the same legal residence and has continuously  been enrolled in a
school in the district since the boundary change.
(6)(a) An individual who is a homeless student shall be considered a resident of the school
district where the individual’s school  of origin is located if the individual is placed in the
individual’s school of origin as provided by sections 2 to 5 of this 2026 Act.
(b) As used in this subsection, “homeless student”  and “school of origin” have the
meanings given those terms in section 2 of this 2026 Act.
[(6)(a)] (7)(a) Individuals who are foreign exchange students and who are residing in  Oregon in
a dormitory operated by a school district are considered to be residents of  the school district in
which the dormitory is located.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection:
(A) An individual may not be considered to be a foreign exchange student for  more than one
school year.
(B) An individual may be considered to be a  resident of a school district as provided by this
subsection only if, for the 2010-2011 school year, the school district had foreign exchange  students
who would have been considered residents under the provisions of this subsection.
(C) The number of individuals who may be considered residents under  the provisions of this
subsection may not  increase relative to the number who would have been considered residents under
the provisions of this subsection for the 2010-2011 school year.
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-A) Page 7
(c) As used in this subsection, “foreign  exchange student” means an individual who attends
school in Oregon under a cultural  exchange program and whose parent, guardian or person in par-
ental relationship resides in another country.
SECTION 7.  ORS 339.115 is amended to read:
339.115. (1) Except as provided in ORS 339.141, authorizing tuition  for courses not part of the
regular school program, the district school board shall admit free of charge to the schools  of the
district all persons between the ages of 5  and 19 who reside within the school district. A person
whose 19th birthday occurs during the school year shall continue to  be eligible for a free and ap-
propriate public education for the remainder of the  school year. A district school board may admit
nonresident persons, determine who is not a resident of the district  and fix rates of tuition for
nonresidents.
(2)(a) A district must admit an otherwise eligible person who  has not yet attained 21 years of
age prior to the beginning of the current school year if the person is:
(A) Receiving special education and has not yet received a high school diploma as described  in
ORS 329.451; or
(B) Receiving special education and  has received a modified diploma, an extended diploma or a
certificate of attendance as described in ORS 329.451.
(b) A district may admit an otherwise eligible person who is not receiving special  education and
who has not yet  attained 21 years of age prior to the beginning of the current school year if the
person is shown to be in need of additional  education in order to receive a high school diploma or
a modified diploma.
(3) The obligation to make a free appropriate public  education available to individuals with
disabilities 18 through 21  years of age who are incarcerated in an adult correctional facility applies
only to those individuals who, in their last educational placement prior to their incarceration in the
adult correctional facility:
(a) Were identified as being a child with a disability as defined in ORS 343.035; or
(b) Had an individualized education program as described in ORS 343.151.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, “adult correctional facility” means:
(a) A local correctional facility as defined in ORS 169.005;
(b) A regional correctional facility as defined in ORS 169.620; or
(c) A Department of Corrections institution as defined in ORS 421.005.
(5) An otherwise eligible person under subsection (2) of this section whose  21st birthday occurs
during the school year shall continue to be eligible for a free appropriate public education for  the
remainder of the school year.
(6) The person may apply to the board of  directors of the school district of residence for ad-
mission after the 19th birthday as  provided in subsection (1) of this section. A person aggrieved by
a decision of the local board may appeal to the State Board of Education. The  decision of the state
board is final and not subject to appeal.
(7) Notwithstanding ORS 339.133  (2)(a), a school district shall not exclude from admission a child
located in the district solely because the child [ does not have a fixed place of residence or  solely be-
cause the child is not under the supervision of a parent, guardian or person in a parental
relationship] is a homeless student, as defined in section 2 of this 2026 Act .
(8) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a school district:
(a) May for the remaining period  of an expulsion deny admission to the regular school to a
resident student who is expelled from another school district; and
(b) Shall for at least one calendar year from the date of the expulsion and if the expulsion  is for
more than one calendar year, may for the  remaining period of time deny admission to the regular
school program to a student who is under  expulsion from another school district for an offense that
constitutes a violation of a school district policy adopted pursuant to ORS 339.250 (7).
(9) Notwithstanding the minimum age requirement prescribed by ORS 339.010 and 339.020,  a
district school board may admit free of charge a  child whose needs for cognitive, social and physical
development would best be met in the school program, as defined by policies of the district  school
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-A) Page 8
board, to enter school even though  the child has not attained the minimum age requirement but is
a resident of the district.
SECTION 8.  ORS 343.035 is amended to read:
343.035. As used in this chapter unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Child with a  disability” means a school-age child who is entitled to a free appropriate public
education as specified by ORS  339.115 and who requires special education because the child has
been evaluated as having one of  the following conditions as defined by rules established by the State
Board of Education:
(a) Intellectual disability;
(b) Deafness or being hard of hearing;
(c) Speech or language impairment;
(d) Visual impairment, including blindness;
(e) Deafblindness;
(f) Emotional behavior disability;
(g) Orthopedic impairment;
(h) Other health impairment;
(i) Autism spectrum disorder;
(j) Traumatic brain injury;
(k) Specific learning disabilities; or
(L) Developmental delay, if the child is three through nine years of age.
(2) “Decision” means the decision of the hearing officer.
(3) “Determination” means the determination by the school district concerning the  identifica-
tion, evaluation or educational placement of a child with a disability or the  provision of a free ap-
propriate public education to the child in a program paid for by the district.
(4) “Developmental delay” means:
(a) Delay, at a level of functioning and in accordance with criteria established by  rules of the
State Board of Education, in one or more of the following developmental areas:
(A) Cognitive development;
(B) Physical development, including vision and hearing;
(C) Communication development;
(D) Social or emotional development; or
(E) Adaptive development; or
(b) A disability,  in accordance with criteria established by rules of the State Board of Education,
that can be expected to continue indefinitely and is likely to cause a  substantial delay in a child’s
development and ability to function independently in society.
(5) “Early childhood special education” means instruction that is:
(a) Free, appropriate and specially designed to meet the unique needs of a preschool child  with
a disability;
(b) Provided from three years of age until the age of eligibility for kindergarten; and
(c) Provided in any of the following settings:
(A) The home, a hospital, an institution, a special  school, a classroom or a community child care
setting;
(B) A preschool; or
(C) A combination  of a setting described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and a preschool.
(6) “Early intervention services” means services for preschool  children with disabilities from
birth until three years of age that are:
(a) Designed to meet the developmental needs of children with disabilities and the  needs of the
family related to enhancing the child’s development;
(b) Selected in collaboration with the parents; and
(c) Provided:
(A) Under public supervision;
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-A) Page 9
(B) By personnel qualified in accordance with criteria established by rules  of the State Board
of Education; and
(C) In conformity with an individualized family service plan.
(7) “Individualized education program” means a written statement  of an educational program for
a child  with a disability that is developed, reviewed and revised in a meeting in accordance with
criteria established by rules of the State Board of Education for each child eligible for special  edu-
cation and related services under this chapter.
(8) “Individualized family service plan”  means a written plan of early childhood special educa-
tion, related services, early intervention services and other  services developed in accordance with
criteria established by rules of the State Board of Education for each  child eligible for services
under this chapter.
(9) “Instruction” means providing children and families with information  and skills that support
the achievement of the goals and outcomes in the child’s  individualized family service plan and
working  with  preschool children with disabilities in one or more of the following developmental
areas:
(a) Communication development;
(b) Social or emotional development;
(c) Physical development, including vision and hearing;
(d) Adaptive development; and
(e) Cognitive development.
(10) “Mediation” means a voluntary process in which an impartial mediator assists and  facili-
tates two or more parties to a controversy in  reaching a mutually acceptable resolution of the
controversy and includes all contacts between a mediator and any party or agent of a party, until
such time as a resolution is agreed to by the parties or the mediation process is terminated.
(11) “Order” has the meaning given that term in ORS chapter 183.
(12) “Other services”  means those services that may be provided to preschool children with
disabilities and to their families that are not early childhood special education or early intervention
services and are not paid for with early childhood special education or early intervention funds.
(13) “Parent”  means the parent, person acting as a parent or a legal guardian, other than a state
agency, of the child or the surrogate parent. “Parent” may be further defined  by rules adopted by
the State Board of Education.
(14) “Preschool child with a disability” means a child from:
(a) Birth  until three years of age who is eligible for early intervention services because the child
is experiencing developmental delay or has a diagnosed mental or physical condition  that will result
in developmental delay; or
(b) Three years of age to eligibility for entry  into kindergarten who needs early childhood spe-
cial education services because the child has been evaluated as  having one of the conditions listed
under subsection (1) of this section.
(15)(a) “Related  services” means transportation and such developmental, corrective and other
supportive services as are required to assist a child with a disability to benefit  from special educa-
tion, including:
(A) Speech-language and audiology services;
(B) Interpreting services;
(C) Psychological services;
(D) Physical and occupational therapy;
(E) Recreation, including therapeutic recreation;
(F) Social work services;
(G) School nurse services designed to enable a child with a  disability to receive a free appro-
priate public education as described in the individualized education program of the child;
(H) Early identification and assessment of disabilities in children;
(I) Counseling services, including rehabilitation counseling;
(J) Orientation and mobility services;
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-A) Page 10
(K) Medical services for diagnostic or evaluation purposes;
(L) Parent counseling and training; and
(M) Assistive technology.
(b) “Related services” does not include a medical device that  is surgically implanted or the re-
placement of a medical device that is surgically implanted.
(16) “School district” means a common or union high school district that  is charged with the
duty or contracted with by a public agency to educate children eligible for special education.
(17) “Service coordination” means the activities carried out by a  service coordinator to assist
and enable a preschool child with a  disability and the child’s family to receive the rights, procedural
safeguards and  services that are authorized under the state’s early intervention and early childhood
special education programs and to coordinate access to other services designated on  the individ-
ualized family service plan.
(18) “Special education” means specially designed instruction that is  provided at no cost to
parents to meet the unique needs  of a child with a disability. “Special education” includes instruc-
tion that:
(a) May be conducted in the classroom, the home, a hospital, an institution, a special school or
another setting; and
(b) May involve physical education services, speech-language services, transition  services or
other related services designated by rule to be services to meet the unique  needs of a child with a
disability.
(19) “Transition services” means a coordinated set of activities for a  child with a disability that:
(a) Is designed to be within a results-oriented process;
(b) Is focused on improving the academic and functional achievement of  the child to facilitate
the child’s transition from school to post-school activities, including  post-secondary education, com-
petitive employment, independent living and community inclusion;
(c) Is based  on the individual child’s needs, taking into account the child’s preferences and in-
terests; and
(d) May be special education, or related services, and may include earning credit at  a commu-
nity college or public university listed in ORS 352.002.
[(20) “Unaccompanied homeless youth” has the meaning given that term in the McKinney-Vento
Homeless Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. 11434a(6).]
(20) “Unaccompanied youth” has the meaning given that  term in section 2 of this 2026
Act.
(21) “Ward of the state” means a child who is temporarily or permanently in the custody of, or
committed to, a  public or  private agency through the action of the juvenile court. “Ward of the
state” may be further defined by rules adopted by the State Board of Education.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 343.155 is amended to read:
343.155. The State Board of Education shall  establish by rule procedures to protect the rights
of every child  with a disability who is eligible for special education and every child who there is a
reasonable cause to believe has a disability, including:
(1) Rules providing for the participation of the parents of a child with a disability in  meetings
regarding the child’s identification, evaluation, individualized education program, educational
placement and the provision of a free appropriate public education to the child.
(2) Rules governing the procedures for the appointment of a surrogate for the parent and other
rules necessary to protect the special educational rights of the child, which  shall include, but need
not be limited to, rules applicable whenever:
(a) No parent of the child can be identified or located after reasonable efforts;
(b) There is reasonable  cause to believe that the child has a disability and is a ward of the state;
(c) The child is an [ unaccompanied homeless youth ] unaccompanied youth;
(d) The  child reaches the age of majority and has been determined not to have the ability to give
informed consent regarding the child’s education; or
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-A) Page 11
(e) The parent, guardian or former guardian of the child is disqualified from being  appointed as
a surrogate under ORS 343.156.
(3) Rules  prescribing mediation procedures, resolution sessions and hearings procedures if iden-
tification, evaluation, individualized education program or placement is contested.
(4) Rules prescribing when notice of procedural safeguards must be given to the  parents or the
child with a disability who has reached the age of majority, the content of the notice and  the lan-
guage of the notice.
(5) Rules prescribing standards and procedures for disciplinary actions for behavior or miscon-
duct of a child with a disability.
(6) Other procedural safeguards as required by law.
Passed by House February 20, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-A) Page 12